Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  ending June 30,
2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts:
(1) $65,000,000 for  the operations, services and administration of emergency shelters,
Project Turnkey sites and navigation centers.
(2) $34,000,000 for homelessness prevention services, including  those delivered through
the Oregon  Eviction Diversion and Prevention and Eviction Prevention Rapid Response Pro-
grams, as well as services administered by culturally responsive organizations, as defined  in
ORS 456.005.
(3) $7,000,000 for  distribution to Urban League of Portland for homelessness prevention
services.
(4) $5,000,000 to provide matching funds for  deposits into individual development accounts
under ORS 458.675 to 458.700.
(5) $1,000,000 for distribution to Seeding Justice for  tenant education and to provide
support for residents whose housing may be withdrawn from  publicly supported housing or
is within a manufactured dwelling park being sold or closed.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending June 30,
2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts:
(1) $1,000,000 for  distribution to Community Warehouse to support donation of reused
household goods and furnishings to low-income residents across this state.
(2) $25,000,000 for distribution to Albina Vision Trust for  the purchase and redevelopment
of property on North Dixon Street in Portland for development of affordable housing.
(3) $1,250,000 for  distribution to Center for African Immigrants and Refugees Organiza-
tion for the purchase of property on Southeast  Stark Street for development of affordable
housing.
(4) $3,000,000 for distribution to Center for Intercultural Organizing (DBA Unite  Oregon)
for the purchase of property on East Burnside  Street in Portland for development of af-
fordable housing.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1530 (SB 1530-B) Page 1
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the following amounts:
(1) $15,000,000 for deposit into the Healthy Homes Repair Fund under ORS 431A.402.
(2) $3,500,000 to provide air conditioners and air filters under ORS 431A.430.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the State Department of  Energy, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $4,000,000 for deposit into  the Residential Heat Pump Fund
under section 21, chapter 86, Oregon Laws 2022.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, to provide support for warming or cooling  emer-
gency shelters or facilities as described in ORS 431A.410.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (5), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon  Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for public health, is increased  by
$15,000,000, for expenditure of moneys  deposited in the Healthy Homes Repair Fund under
ORS 431A.402.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter 451, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the State Department of  Energy, is increased by $4,000,000, for res-
idential heat pump program expenditures.
SECTION 8.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the following amounts, for distribution as grants  to the following entities, for
the following purposes:
(1) $700,000 to 4D Recovery, Inc. for young adult recovery housing development.
(2) $700,000 to 4D Recovery, Inc. for LGBTQ+ recovery housing development.
(3) $250,000 to Bay Area First Step, Inc. for Ko-Kwell House operational support.
(4) $180,000 to Bay  Area First Step, Inc. for Koosbay House recovery housing conversion.
(5) $220,000 to Bay Area First Step, Inc. for Sheridan House operational support.
(6) $260,000 to Bay Area First Step, Inc. for Bayview House operational support.
(7) $1,555,275 to Bridges to Change, Inc. for  Clackamas County scattered housing, down
payment and operational support.
(8) $1,555,274 to Bridges to  Change, Inc. for Multnomah County scattered housing, down
payment and operational support.
(9) $600,000 to Bridges to Change, Inc.  for Wasco County scattered housing, down pay-
ment and operational support.
(10) $1,555,274 to Bridges to Change, Inc. for Washington  County scattered housing, down
payment and operational support.
(11) $850,000 to Free on the  Outside, Inc. for Deschutes County re-entry men’s home
purchase.
(12) $750,000 to Free on the  Outside, Inc. for Washington County justice-involved men’s
home purchase.
(13) $720,000 to Free on the Outside, Inc. for Clackamas County reentry men’s home
purchase.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1530 (SB 1530-B) Page 2
(14) $750,000 to Iron Tribe Network for Multnomah County self-pay home purchase.
(15) $750,000 to Iron Tribe Network for Columbia County self-pay home purchase.
(16) $260,000 to Iron Tribe Network for Clackamas County subsidy/peer option operational
cost subsidy.
(17) $650,000 to Iron Tribe Network for Marion County self-pay home purchase.
(18) $500,000 to Juntos NW, Inc. for transitional housing program.
(19) $211,000 to The Lasko Refuge, LLC for Lasko Refuge housing expansion.
(20) $500,000 to Miracles Club MLK Limited Partnership for purchase of sober housing.
(21) $500,000  to Miracles Club MLK Limited Partnership for purchase of stabilization
housing.
(22) $700,000 to Painted Horse Recovery, Inc. for recovery housing purchase.
(23) $915,177 to Transcending Hope for next steps rapid rehousing expansion.
(24) $1,020,000 to Transcending Hope for Familias Transcendiendo down  payment and op-
erational support.
(25) $350,000 to Transcending Hope for Above and Beyond down payment and operational
support for recovery housing.
(26) $900,000 to Tillamook Family Counseling Center, Inc. for Tillamook transitional  re-
covery housing purchase.
(27) $98,000 to West  Coast Sober Housing, Inc. for women’s housing operational costs
support.
SECTION 9.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for  the biennium ending June 30,
2025, out of the General Fund,  the following amounts for distribution to the following entities
for the following infrastructure projects to support the development of housing:
(1) $2,100,000 to the City of Albany for extension of water and sewer infrastructure.
(2) $3,000,000 to the City of Beaverton for the Kemmer Booster  Pump Station to provide
drinking water supply to new neighborhoods in Cooper Mountain Community Plan Area.
(3) $1,500,000 to the City of Butte Falls for wastewater treatment plant and lift station
upgrades.
(4) $1,186,000 to the  City of Chiloquin for water, sewer and stormwater improvements for
Street/King Kong Housing Development and Valley Street/Mountain Street.
(5) $3,000,000 to the City of Cottage Grove to  install water, sewer and stormwater
infrastructure for a 35-acre parcel the city owns for housing development.
(6) $1,000,000  to the City of Creswell for wastewater treatment facility upgrades and
connections to a regional treatment facility.
(7) $1,300,000 to the City of  Culver for mainline sewer reroute to provide sewer to resi-
dential development.
(8) $1,000,000 to the City of Dallas for sewer and stormwater infrastructure  upgrades for
La Creole Node master plan.
(9) $6,000,000 to the City of Eugene for water and sewer infrastructure improvements
along Crow Road.
(10) $1,900,000 to the City of Florence for water, sewer and wastewater infrastructure for
four blocks of city-owned property to be developed.
(11) $1,000,000 to the City of Gold Hill for replacement of water distribution  main line and
improvements and upgrades to water treatment facilities.
(12) $3,000,000 to the City of Gresham  for water, sewer and stormwater improvements for
the redevelopment of former Kmart property in Civic Neighborhood at NW Eastman Park-
way and NW Burnside Road.
(13) $2,438,595 to the City of  Hood River for water, sewer and stormwater site improve-
ments for 7.1 acres of city-owned land for housing development.
(14) $1,100,000 to the City of Hubbard  for upgrades to a wastewater lift station, water
system improvements and wastewater system improvements.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1530 (SB 1530-B) Page 3
(15) $500,000 to the City of Independence for sewer infrastructure for  Polk Community
Development Corporation on Gun Club Road.
(16) $1,705,000 to the City of Irrigon for water  and sewer infrastructure for the
Tumbleweed development and the Molly development.
(17) $100,000 to the City  of Klamath Falls for a new sewer lift station for housing devel-
opment.
(18) $250,000 to the Klamath  Housing Authority for a new sewer lift station for housing
development.
(19) $1,753,185 to the City of Lake Oswego  for water, sewer and stormwater
infrastructure improvements for Habitat for Humanity development.
(20) $3,000,000 to the City of Lincoln City for a booster pump station for Spring Lake
housing development.
(21) $1,425,000 to the City of Madras for stormwater infrastructure for The Heights  at
Yarrow Apartments and Belmont Lane Apartments.
(22) $2,709,000 to the City of Manzanita for water and stormwater  infrastructure for
residential housing development.
(23) $195,094 to the City of McMinnville for water, stormwater and sewer  infrastructure
gap funding for housing development.
(24) $945,000 to the City of Medford to construct a regional stormwater facility to serve
the New Spirit development.
(25) $1,200,000 to the City of Monmouth for water, sewer and stormwater improvements
for Riddle Road development.
(26) $900,000 to the City of North Bend  for stormwater and sewer collection system up-
grades for Gloria Dei site development and  water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure im-
provements for Maple Leaf development.
(27) $3,000,000 to the Oak Lodge Water Services  Authority for wastewater treatment fa-
cility upgrades.
(28) $1,650,000 to the City of Phoenix  for water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure
improvements to extend water line to service developable property.
(29) $2,000,000 to the City of  Prineville for water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure
for multifamily development.
(30) $2,500,000 to  the City of Redmond for water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure
for Northpoint Vista development.
(31) $1,500,000 to the City of Shady Cove  for development of the city drinking water sys-
tem.
(32) $3,000,000 to the City of Siletz for wastewater treatment plant upgrades.
(33) $3,000,000 to the City of Springfield  for sewer infrastructure improvements for
Glenwood Riverfront area development.
(34) $3,000,000 to the  City of Stayton for sewer infrastructure improvements along Ida
Street and Marion from Evergreen to 4th.
(35) $2,865,000 to the City  of Sutherlin for water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure
improvements for Oak Terrace Village housing development.
(36) $300,000 to the City of Talent for water  and sewer system development charges for
infrastructure and water, sewer and stormwater  infrastructure improvements for housing
development.
(37) $274,057 to the City of Tillamook for improvements for Jones-Knudson Apartments.
(38) $1,566,000 to  the City of Tigard for sewer and stormwater infrastructure improve-
ments for housing development.
(39) $3,000,000 to the Tualatin Valley Water District for upgrades  to the pump station on
SW 189th Avenue in Beaverton.
(40) $6,000,000 to Prosper Portland for the extension of NW Johnson Street  and associ-
ated water and sewer utilities to support the construction of new affordable housing units.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1530 (SB 1530-B) Page 4
(41) $6,000,000 to Prosper Portland for the construction of a  new SW Water Avenue and
associated water and sewer utilities to support new  affordable housing units as a part of the
OMSI District Master Plan.
(42) $4,000,000 to the Warm Springs Housing Authority for  interior and exterior rehabil-
itation of  two-, three- and four-bedroom houses used as rental units on the Warm Springs
Reservation.
(43) $635,000 to the Linn-Benton Housing Authority for infrastructure and site utility
costs for the Valor Place Apartments in Albany.
(44) $300,000 to the City of Salem for an  affordable veterans housing development in West
Salem.
SECTION 10. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June  30,
2025, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $575,496 for administration of infrastructure
projects established under section 9 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 11. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Transportation, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $4,000,000, for distribution to  the City of Pendleton for
construction of an arterial road needed to open land for housing development.
SECTION 12. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  out of
the General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000, for deposit in the  Water Supply Development
Account established in ORS 541.656, to issue a grant to the City of Riddle for a new  water
storage reservoir to support Habitat for Humanity homes.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (4), chapter 460, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal funds received under
cooperative agreements with or contracts from the Bureau  of Reclamation of the United
States Department of the Interior, the United States  Army Corps of Engineers, the United
States Geological Survey, the  Bonneville Power Administration and the National Fish and
Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section
3, chapter 460,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Water Resources Department,
for technical services, is increased by $1,500,000, for paying costs  from the Water Supply
Development Account established in ORS 541.656 for the City of  Riddle for a new water
storage reservoir to support Habitat for Humanity homes.
SECTION 14. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1530 (SB 1530-B) Page 5
Passed by Senate February 29, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1530 (SB 1530-B) Page 6